District of Columbia statutes.
1-301.87

Chief Deputy Attorney General, Deputy Attorneys General, and Assistant Attorneys General.

(a)

The Attorney General shall appoint a Chief Deputy Attorney General who shall meet the qualifications of § 1-301.83. The Chief Deputy Attorney General shall serve under the direction and control of the Attorney General and shall perform such duties as may be assigned to him or her by the Attorney General.

(b)

(1)

The Deputy Attorneys General and Assistant Attorneys General shall serve under the direction and control of the Attorney General and shall perform such duties as may be assigned to them by the Attorney General.

(2)

A Deputy Attorney General shall be a resident of the District of Columbia within 180 days of his or her appointment.

May 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-160, § 107, 57 DCR 3012

History